Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Chapter 17 Tennessee Nonprofit Gaming Law
3-17-113. Compliance — Penalties — Hearings — Investigations.

The secretary may publicly or privately investigate, as the secretary of state deems necessary, any person or organization that the secretary has reason to believe has violated this chapter. The secretary may assess a civil penalty against any person, or a nonprofit organization, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for a violation of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter. Any hearing on the imposition of a civil penalty pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall have jurisdiction over, and shall investigate, violations of §§ 39-17-651 — 39-17-657 and reports of official misconduct concerning this chapter in a manner consistent with title 38, chapter 6, part 1.

Subsection (a) shall apply to applications and annual events to be conducted on and after July 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 2; 2005, ch. 207, § 18; 2007, ch. 18, § 14; 2015, ch. 134, § 21.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “nonprofit” for “501(c)(3)” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 134, § 28. April 14, 2015.

3-17-114. Criminal background checks.

The secretary of state may establish, by duly promulgated rules and regulations, the procedures and criteria for requiring and obtaining criminal background checks for officers, directors, trustees, and the principal salaried executive staff officer who will operate the annual event for a nonprofit organization. No background check shall be conducted on any such person unless the secretary finds good cause, based upon objective criteria, that the information contained in the annual event application, or supporting documentation, is ambiguous, false or insufficient; provided, that a background check may be required for good cause if based upon reliable information from a law enforcement agency. The secretary of state may utilize the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation to conduct criminal background checks.

Procedures and payments of costs associated with criminal background checks shall be governed by §§ 38-6-103 and 38-6-109. The nonprofit organization that has filed an annual event application shall be responsible for payment of all criminal background checks required by this section. The secretary of state shall not pay for any criminal background check required by this section.

Criminal background checks may include fingerprint checks against state and federal criminal records maintained by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation.

The secretary of state shall be immune from suit for declining to approve the conducting of an annual event based upon criminal background information received pursuant to this section.

In the event that the secretary establishes procedures and criteria for requiring and obtaining criminal background checks, such checks shall not be performed upon officers, directors or trustees who receive no compensation for their duties associated with the nonprofit organization.

In the event that the secretary establishes procedures and criteria for requiring and obtaining criminal background checks, such provisions shall only apply to annual event applications for the operation of annual events to be conducted on and after July 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 2; 2015, ch. 134, § 22.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “nonprofit” for “501(c)(3)” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 134, § 28. April 14, 2015.

3-17-115. Rules and regulations by secretary of state.

The secretary of state is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations as the secretary of state may deem necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Notwithstanding §§ 4-5-208 and 4-5-209 or any other law to the contrary, the secretary of state is authorized to promulgate emergency rules to implement this chapter.

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 11; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

3-17-116. [Repealed.]

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 12; 2009, ch. 566, § 12; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 821, § 7, effective July 1, 2016.

Compiler’s Notes. Former §3-17-116 concerned the authority of the Tennessee claims commission to promulgate rules and regulations.